District of Columbia statutes.
10-135

Part of reservation 13 transferred for use as indigent burial ground.

All of that portion of reservation 13 lying 600 feet east of the east curb line of Nineteenth Street east and south of the south line of B Street south is transferred to the control of the Mayor of the District of Columbia for the purpose of the burial of the indigent dead of the District, to be an addition to the burial grounds of the Washington Asylum.

History

Aug. 6, 1890, 26 Stat. 306, ch. 724

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-135.
1973 Ed., § 8-141.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.